Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201513-1907
Rules and regulations; annual reports; evaluation; Governor; powers.

(1) The Department of Economic Development shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 13-1901 to 13-1907 which shall include standardized reporting and application procedures. Each development district shall submit annual performance and financial reports to the department which shall address the activities performed and services delivered.

(2) The Governor shall, from time to time, evaluate the effectiveness and activities of the development districts receiving assistance. If the Governor finds a development district to be ineffective, he or she may take action, including the withholding of assistance authorized under section 13-1906.

Laws 1992, LB 573, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB661, § 27.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.